Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 331, O.S.L.
2022 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 1151.30), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1151.30. A. A residential or commercial roofing
contractor providing repairs or improvement services to be paid by
an insured from the proceeds of a property or casualty insurance
policy shall not, as an inducement to the sale or provision of goods
or services to an insured, advertise or promise to pay, directly or
indirectly, all or part of any applicable insurance deductible or
offer to compensate an insured for providing any service to the
insured. If a roofing contractor violates the provisions of this
section, the insurer to whom the insured tendered the claim shall
not be obligated to consider the estimate prepared by the roofing
contractor. Every roofing contractor shall provide a written

notification of the requirements of this section with its initial
estimate. The adjuster or insurer shall provide a written
notification of the requirements of this section in the initial
estimate relating to the claim.
B. Any person may file a written duly verified complaint with
the registrar alleging a violation of this section. The complaint
shall be on a form approved by the registrar and shall set forth the
alleged act or omission provided in subsection A of this section,
and a statement of sufficient facts upon which a reasonable person
could conclude that the act or omission specified in subsection A of
this section has been committed. All complaints filed with the
registrar shall be open to public inspection. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require the complainant to first file
a complaint with the registrar before seeking relief or remedies
allowed by law.
C. 1. The registrar shall forward all complaints alleging
violations of this section to the Insurance Department and the
Office of the Attorney General for investigation, enforcement, and
prosecution of any alleged violation.
2. A complaint received by the registrar pursuant to this
section shall be referred to the district attorney for appropriate
disposition as determined by the district attorney in his or her
discretion.
D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the
registrar to investigate or prosecute any violations of this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1257 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1257 Page 3